District of Columbia statutes.
29-1125

Winding up and termination.

Winding up and termination of an unincorporated nonprofit association shall proceed in accordance with the following rules:

(1)

All known debts and liabilities shall be paid or adequately provided for.

(2)

Any property subject to a condition requiring return to the person designated by the donor shall be transferred to that person.

(3)

Any property subject to a trust shall be distributed in accordance with the trust agreement.

(4)

Any remaining property shall be distributed as follows:

(A)

As required by law other than this chapter that requires assets of an association to be distributed to another person with similar nonprofit purposes;

(B)

In accordance with the association’s governing principles or, in the absence of applicable governing principles, to the members of the association per capita or as the members direct; or

(C)

If subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph does not apply, in accordance with the law of unclaimed property in the District.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 29 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).
This section is referenced in § 29-1122 and § 29-1124.